Alabama, session 2026rs, SB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a)(1) The Board of Pardons and Paroles
shall allow an inmate to participate in his or her parole
hearing via telephone, video conference, or any other similar
communications system that allows the inmate to interact with
the members of the Board of Pardons and Paroles. The board
shall give the victim, victim's family, and others
representing the victim the option to see or hear the inmate's
statement.
(2) The board shall allow any other individual
participating in a parole hearing, including, but not limited
to, the victim, the victim's family, a crime victim advocate,
a law enforcement officer, or a prosecutor, to participate in
a parole hearing via telephone, video conference, or any other
similar communications system.
(3) An inmate may waive his or her rights provided
under this subsection.
(b) Unless the victim or the victim's family chooses
otherwise, the board shall not allow an inmate to see, hear,
or otherwise interact with victims, victims' families, or
crime victim advocates who address the board or attend the
hearing.
Page 1

hearing.
SB240 Enrolled
(c) If the communications system fails or is in any way
interrupted during a hearing, the board shall suspend the
hearing until communication is reestablished.
(d) The board shall only provide access to the hearing
to individuals permitted to speak pursuant to rules
established by the board. Individuals authorized to speak may
speak by telephone, video conference, or any other similar
communications system. The board shall use video conferencing
when that communications system is available; otherwise, the
board may choose any other authorized communication method.
(e) The Department of Corrections shall procure a
telephone, video conference, or other communications system to
allow each inmate to participate in his or her parole hearing
via the approved telephone, video conference, or any other
similar communications system. The communications system shall
allow the inmate to interact with the members of the board at
the parole hearing. The department shall cooperate with the
board in the implementation of this act.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on March 1,
2027.
Page 2

2027.
SB240 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB240
Senate 24-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 07-Apr-26




By: Senator Barfoot
Page 3